Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 221.091, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Small vehicle passenger service. (a) A statutory or home rule charter city that licenses and regulates small vehicle passenger service must do so by ordinance. The ordinance must, at a minimum, provide for driver qualifications, insurance, vehicle safety, and periodic vehicle inspections. new text begin (b) A statutory or home rule charter city may waive any licensing fees for a transportation network company or taxicab company that maintains 7.5 percent of the company's active fleet as wheelchair accessible vehicles. For purposes of this paragraph, "transportation network company" has the meaning given in section 65B.472, subdivision 1. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end A statutory or home rule charter city that has adopted an ordinance complying with this subdivision may enforce the registration requirement in section 221.021. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A statutory or home rule charter city that regulates, by ordinance, pedicabs, rickshaws, or other similar vehicles used for passenger service may permit authorized vehicles to be equipped with an electric motor that meets the requirements for an electric-assisted bicycle under section 169.011, subdivision 27, clause (3). Sec. 2. new text begin [221.56] TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY ACCESSIBILITY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of sections 221.56 to 221.59, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Transportation network company" or "TNC" has the meaning given in section 65B.472, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (c) "Wheelchair accessible vehicle" means a vehicle equipped with a ramp or lift capable of transporting nonfolding motorized wheelchairs, mobility scooters, or other mobility devices. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Wheelchair accessibility surcharge. new text end new text begin (a) Transportation network companies must pay to the commissioner a surcharge of $0.28 per ride originating in this state that is not accessible to wheelchair users. The surcharge must be paid monthly. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must deposit all surcharges collected under this subdivision into the wheelchair accessible vehicle services account established under section 221.57. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Special transportation services. new text end new text begin (a) Transportation network companies may provide wheelchair accessible vehicle special transportation services and nonemergency medical transportation services under the operating standards and rules adopted pursuant to section 174.30. Transportation network companies must meet all state and federal standards to provide these services. new text end new text begin (b) A transportation network company providing services under paragraph (a) must pay to the commissioner $0.28 per ride. This surcharge must be paid monthly. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must deposit all surcharges collected under this subdivision into the wheelchair accessible vehicle services account established under section 221.57. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Digital network accessibility. new text end new text begin A transportation network company's digital network must be accessible to individuals with disabilities by July 1, 2027, in conformance with Americans with Disabilities Act digital accessibility rules. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Equity data report. new text end new text begin (a) By October 1 each year, all transportation network companies must report to the commissioner and the Minnesota Council on Disability about the accessibility of services provided in the previous year to individuals with disabilities in each community served. At a minimum, the report must include the: new text end new text begin (1) estimated time of arrival for wheelchair accessible vehicles; new text end new text begin (2) total number of wheelchair accessible vehicles requested; new text end new text begin (3) total number of rides fulfilled in wheelchair accessible vehicles; new text end new text begin (4) total number of wheelchair accessible rides that were denied; new text end new text begin (5) total number of requested wheelchair accessible rides that were referred to a third party; and new text end new text begin (6) programs and best practices the transportation network company has implemented to improve the accessibility of service to individuals with disabilities. new text end new text begin (b) All data required in the report must be capable of aggregation by city so useful comparisons may be made. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Nondiscrimination policy. new text end new text begin All transportation network companies must adopt a nondiscrimination policy that is available on a publicly accessible website. The website must provide notice of the policy and procedures to report a complaint to the Department of Human Rights about a driver's alleged violation of the policy. The policy must include: new text end new text begin (1) the transportation network company must take reasonable steps to ensure services provided by drivers using the digital network are offered in a nondiscriminatory manner; new text end new text begin (2) the transportation network company and drivers must not unlawfully discriminate against a prospective passenger or unlawfully refuse to provide service to a protected class of passengers or certain localities; new text end new text begin (3) drivers must not refuse services to a prospective passenger with a service animal; new text end new text begin (4) the transportation network company must not charge an individual with a disability an additional fee, including for the transport of a service animal, because of the individual's disabilities; new text end new text begin (5) the transportation network company must provide on its digital network a way for passengers with disabilities to request a wheelchair accessible vehicle; new text end new text begin (6) the transportation network company must facilitate available transportation for passengers requiring a wheelchair accessible vehicle by: new text end new text begin (i) connecting the passenger to a driver of a wheelchair accessible vehicle in the network; or new text end new text begin (ii) directing the passenger to an alternate provider with the authority and ability to dispatch a wheelchair accessible vehicle; new text end new text begin (7) if a passenger with a disability requires the use of a wheelchair, assistive technology, or other mobility device, the driver must store and transport the equipment if reasonably able to do so. If the driver is unable to reasonably store and transport the equipment, the driver must refer the passenger to another driver or service provider with a vehicle able to accommodate the equipment; new text end new text begin (8) drivers must allow wheelchair users the choice to independently transfer from their wheelchairs to the wheelchair accessible vehicle if they are able to do so; new text end new text begin (9) when a ride is requested over the digital network, the total estimated fare, fare range, or rate by distance or time must be displayed before the ride is confirmed. Any variables that may result in higher rates or fares, including tips, wait time, demand pricing, or any other surcharges or fees, must also be displayed; new text end new text begin (10) passengers living with disabilities or perceived disabilities may not be negatively rated by the driver for reasons directly related to their disability or perceived disability or use of disability equipment; new text end new text begin (11) the transportation network company must not charge a fee if a passenger cancels a ride because the vehicle is unsuitable for the passenger's disability needs; new text end new text begin (12) the transportation network company must not charge an additional fee for a personal companion, orderly, or any other care assistant accompanying a passenger with a disability on a ride; new text end new text begin (13) the transportation network company must not impose a minimum charge when a driver is unable to locate a passenger using a wheelchair or mobility device; new text end new text begin (14) the transportation network company must allow a passenger to contact a driver over the digital network or telephone after a ride is confirmed if the passenger provides adequate contact information; and new text end new text begin (15) a reference to the nondiscrimination requirements under section 181C.06. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [221.57] WHEELCHAIR ACCESSIBLE VEHICLE SERVICES ACCOUNT; GRANTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Wheelchair accessible vehicle services account established. new text end new text begin A wheelchair accessible vehicle services account is created in the special revenue fund. The account consists of surcharge payments required under section 221.56, subdivisions 2 and 3, and any money appropriated, allotted, donated, transferred, or otherwise deposited into the account. Money in the account is appropriated to the commissioner and distributed as provided in subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Minimum collections. new text end new text begin If the commissioner does not collect a minimum of $500,000 per year from transportation network companies and taxicab companies under section 221.56, subdivisions 2 and 3, for the wheelchair accessible vehicle services account, then the amount sufficient to reach the minimum collection threshold is annually transferred from the general fund to the wheelchair accessible vehicle services account. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grant eligibility. new text end new text begin (a) A taxicab company or an independent contractor of a transportation network company who provides a service record of at least six months with that company is eligible for grants under subdivision 5. A grant under subdivision 5 may be used to meet a goal of having 7.5 percent of vehicles in the active fleet be wheelchair accessible. new text end new text begin (b) Wheelchair accessible vehicle drivers and grantees must complete disability training designed by the Minnesota Council on Disability to be eligible to receive grants under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin (c) A driver of a leased vehicle is not eligible for a grant covering the cost or maintenance of a wheelchair accessible vehicle unrelated to a wheelchair accessibility modification. new text end new text begin (d) For purposes of this subdivision, "active fleet" means the total number of vehicles registered with the transportation network company or taxicab company capable of providing rides. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grant applications. new text end new text begin An eligible taxicab company or independent contractor of a transportation network company must submit an application to the Wheelchair Accessible Vehicle Services Committee established under section 221.58 and include a: new text end new text begin (1) copy of each driver's valid driver's license; new text end new text begin (2) Form I-9, Employment Eligibility Verification for each driver; new text end new text begin (3) signed attestation that the entity has provided at least six months of transportation network company services in this state; and new text end new text begin (4) signed attestation that the entity will comply with all program requirements, as defined by the committee. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Grants. new text end new text begin Upon the recommendations of the Wheelchair Accessible Vehicle Services Committee established under section 221.58, the commissioner must award grants using money in the wheelchair accessible vehicle services account to taxicab companies, independent contractors of transportation network companies, dealers, vendors, training providers, or other related entities, as defined by the committee: new text end new text begin (1) to purchase, lease, or rent wheelchair accessible vehicles or modify existing vehicles to be wheelchair accessible for the primary purpose of providing public transportation, up to an amount per purchased or modified vehicle as established by the Wheelchair Accessible Vehicle Services Committee; new text end new text begin (2) for maintenance or equipment expenses related to ramps, doors, or other expenses related to the maintenance, repair, and inspection of wheelchair accessible equipment or related equipment for vehicle accessibility, up to an amount per vehicle as established by the Wheelchair Accessible Vehicle Services Committee; new text end new text begin (3) for training and licensing drivers to operate wheelchair accessible vehicles; new text end new text begin (4) for accessible technology transportation research; and new text end new text begin (5) for other driver incentives as determined by the Wheelchair Accessible Vehicle Services Committee. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin Annually by January 15, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation finance and policy detailing grants awarded under this section. The report must detail the recipients of grant awards, the amount of grant awards, and how the grant awards were used. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [221.58] WHEELCHAIR ACCESSIBLE VEHICLE SERVICES COMMITTEE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Wheelchair Accessible Vehicle Services Committee. new text end new text begin In consultation with the Minnesota Council on Disability, the commissioner must appoint the following members to the Wheelchair Accessible Vehicle Services Committee: new text end new text begin (1) one member representing the Department of Transportation; new text end new text begin (2) two members representing the Minnesota Council on Disability; new text end new text begin (3) three members living with a disability; new text end new text begin (4) two members representing TNC drivers; new text end new text begin (5) three members representing TNCs; new text end new text begin (6) one member representing manufacturers of wheelchair accessible vehicles; and new text end new text begin (7) one member representing dealers of wheelchair accessible vehicles. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Organization. new text end new text begin The committee is organized and administered under section 15.059, except section 15.059, subdivision 2, does not apply. Except as provided in section 15.059, subdivision 4, the commissioner must appoint committee members to two-year terms and appoint one member as chair. The committee does not expire. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Conflict of interest. new text end new text begin Committee members must disclose in a written statement any financial interest in any organization that the committee recommends to receive a grant. The written statement must accompany the grant recommendations and must explain the nature of the conflict. The committee is not subject to policies developed by the commissioner of administration under section 16B.98. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The committee must: new text end new text begin (1) establish grant award amounts and develop criteria for evaluating and awarding grants under section 221.57; new text end new text begin (2) recommend to the commissioner legislative changes necessary to implement sections 221.57 and 221.59; new text end new text begin (3) review the performance of the grant program and the wheelchair accessible vehicle services account; and new text end new text begin (4) perform other duties as authorized by the commissioner. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [221.59] WHEELCHAIR ACCESSIBLE VEHICLE SERVICES SUBSIDY PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin In consultation with the Minnesota Council on Disability, the commissioner must establish a wheelchair accessible vehicle services subsidy program. The program must provide for reimbursement to individuals or organizations to purchase, lease, rent, or maintain vehicles used to provide wheelchair accessible transportation services in this state or for other uses as determined by the Wheelchair Accessible Vehicle Services Committee under section 221.58. The commissioner may provide subsidies under this section as grants, loans, rebates, or other forms of funding. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program funding. new text end new text begin (a) Transportation network companies, taxicab companies, and independent contractors who provide private transportation services in this state must contribute $0.28 per ride to the wheelchair accessible vehicle services subsidy account under paragraph (c). Contributions must be made by the end of each month. new text end new text begin (b) If a transportation network company, taxicab company, or independent contractor is more than 60 days past due for contributions required under paragraph (a), the commissioner may suspend the entity's operating license or fine the entity 0.05 percent of the past due contributions per month the contributions are past due. Alternatively, the commissioner may recover the amounts owed in a civil action. new text end new text begin (c) The wheelchair accessible vehicle services subsidy account is created in the special revenue fund. The account consists of contributions made under paragraph (a) and any money appropriated, allotted, donated, transferred, or otherwise deposited into the account. Money in the account is annually appropriated to the commissioner for administration of the account, marketing and awareness of the wheelchair accessible vehicle services subsidy program, data collection and reporting, and reimbursements under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin Individuals and organizations are eligible to receive reimbursement for wheelchair accessible vehicle services if: new text end new text begin (1) each driver has a valid driver's license; new text end new text begin (2) each driver has a valid Form I-9, Employment Eligibility Verification; new text end new text begin (3) the individual or organization has provided at least six months of transportation network company services in this state; and new text end new text begin (4) each driver has completed training designed by the Minnesota Council on Disability. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin An eligible individual or organization must submit an application for reimbursement to the commissioner. The application must include a: new text end new text begin (1) copy of each driver's valid driver's license; new text end new text begin (2) copy of Form I-9, Employment Eligibility Verification for each driver; and new text end new text begin (3) signed attestation of nondiscrimination in accordance with section 221.56, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reimbursements. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must make reimbursements to eligible recipients under this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) Organizations and drivers providing subsidized rides for individuals using special needs ride services or nonemergency medical transportation services under section 174.30 must be reimbursed $1 per ride. Of the amount reimbursed under this paragraph, $0.50 must be reimbursed to the organization and $0.50 must be reimbursed to the driver. new text end new text begin (c) Drivers who provide wheelchair accessible rides may be reimbursed for the costs of training, licensing, and vehicle inspection. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin Annually by January 15, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation detailing reimbursements made under this section. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin WHEELCHAIR ACCESSIBLE VEHICLE SERVICES SUBSIDY PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of transportation to implement the wheelchair accessible vehicle services subsidy grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 221.59. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end